Maryland, session 2026, HB0603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–105.
(b) (1) If there is an increase in property assessment as calculated under this
section, the State and the governing body of each county and of each municipal corporation
shall grant a property tax credit under this section against the State, county, and municipal
corporation property tax imposed on real property by the State, county, or municipal
corporation.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0603*

HOUSE BILL 603
(e) (1) For each taxable year, the property tax credit under this section is
calculated by:
(i) multiplying the prior year’s taxable assessment by the
homestead credit percentage as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
(ii) subtracting that amount from the current year’s assessment; and
(iii) if the difference is a positive number, multiplying the difference
by the applicable property tax rate for the current year.
(2) For each taxable year, the homestead credit percentage under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection is:
(i) for the State property tax and for any property tax imposed for a
bicounty commission, 110%;
(ii) for the county property tax:
1. the homestead credit percentage established by the county
under paragraph (3) of this subsection; or
2. if the county has not set a percentage for the taxable year
under paragraph (3) of this subsection or has not notified the Department as required under
paragraph (6) of this subsection, the homestead credit percentage in effect for the county
for the preceding taxable year; and
(iii) for the municipal corporation property tax:
1. the homestead credit percentage established by the
municipal corporation under paragraph (4) of this subsection; or
2. if the municipal corporation has not set a percentage
under paragraph (4) of this subsection or has not notified the Department as required under
paragraph (7) of this subsection, the homestead credit percentage for the taxable year for
the county in which the property is located.
(3) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, the Mayor and City Council
of Baltimore City and the governing body of a county on or before March 15 of any year
shall set, by law, the homestead credit percentage for the taxable year beginning the
following July 1.
(4) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, on or before March 25 of any
year, the governing body of a municipal corporation may set or alter, by law, a homestead
credit percentage for the taxable year beginning the following July 1 and any subsequent
taxable year.

HOUSE BILL 603 3
(5) (I) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE homestead credit percentage for any county or municipal corporation
property tax:
[(i)] 1. may not be less than 100% or exceed 110% for any taxable
year; and
[(ii)] 2. shall be expressed in increments of 1 percentage point.
(II) THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT PERCENTAGE IN BALTIMORE
COUNTY SHALL BE 100%.
(6) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City and the governing body
of a county shall notify the Department of any action taken under paragraph (3) of this
subsection on or before March 15 preceding the taxable year for which the action is taken.
(7) A municipal corporation shall notify the Department of any action
taken under paragraph (4) of this subsection on or before March 25 preceding the taxable
year for which the action is taken.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.